Rhode Island, session 2025, SB644.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 23-19.1-6 of the General Laws in Chapter 23-19.1 entitled
"Hazardous Waste Management" is hereby amended to read as follows:
23-19.1-6. Powers and duties of the director.
(a) The director shall adopt any plans, rules, regulations, procedures, and standards as may
be necessary to ensure proper, adequate, and sound hazardous waste management and to protect
the health and safety of the public, and the environment from the effects of improper hazardous
waste management. The plans, rules, regulations, procedures, and standards shall be developed by
the director with input and review by the affected persons and agencies including the statewide
planning program, the health department, and representative of the generator, transport, and
disposal industry as well as an environmental representative. The rules, regulations, procedures,
and standards as adopted by the director shall, to the maximum extent practical, be compatible with
the rules, regulations, procedures, and standards promulgated by the U.S. environmental protection
agency pursuant to §§ 3001-3006 of the Federal Resource Conservation and Recovery Act of 1976,
42 U.S.C. § 6901 et seq. The Rhode Island department of environmental management (the
department) rules and regulations for the investigation and remediation of hazardous material
releases (250-RICR-140-30-1) shall not include any provision requiring the remediation of arsenic
which is naturally occurring at levels less than nineteen parts per million (19 ppm).
(b) The director is authorized to exercise all powers, direct and incidental, necessary to
carry out the purposes of this chapter, assure that the state complies with any federal hazardous

waste management act and retains maximum control under it, and receives all desired federal
grants, aid, and other benefits.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC001196
========
LC001196 - Page 2 of 3